Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 28

Unclaimed Property

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

18-28-101. Abandonment of property with service or repair shops — Disposition.

(a)

Any item of clothing left at a dry cleaners which is not claimed within six (6) months shall be deemed abandoned property, and the owner may dispose of the clothing and may retain the proceeds from any sale of the clothing.

(b)(1)

Any audio or video equipment left at a business engaged in the servicing or repair of the equipment shall be deemed abandoned property if the owner of the equipment does not claim the property within six (6) months after the equipment was serviced or repaired or, if no repair or servicing was authorized, then six (6) months after the date the equipment was left at the business.

(2)

The owner of the business may dispose of the abandoned property and retain the proceeds from any sale of the equipment.

(c)

An owner of a business who disposes of property pursuant to this section shall waive all rights to recover fees for performing work on the object.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 799, § 1; 1991, No. 98, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

This section was formerly codified as §18-16-109.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 799, § 2, provided that this act shall be supplemental to all other laws and shall be deemed to repeal or modify only those laws in direct conflict with it.

Acts 1991, No. 98, § 2, provided:

“This act shall be supplemental to all other laws and shall be deemed to repeal or modify only those laws in direct conflict with it.”

18-28-102. Abandonment of jewelry with jeweler or merchant for service, repair, or on consignment — Disposition.

(a)

An item of jewelry left with a jeweler or merchant for service or repair or on consignment that is not claimed within one (1) year or by a later time if the later time is specified in writing shall be deemed abandoned property and may be disposed of under this section without recourse by or liability to the party delivering the jewelry, the owner of the jewelry, or any other party.

(b)

The jeweler or merchant may dispose of the jewelry if at the time of receiving the jewelry:

(1)

The jeweler or merchant gives the party delivering the jewelry notice in writing that:

(A)

The jeweler or merchant may dispose of the jewelry without any liability or accountability to the party delivering the jewelry, the owner of the jewelry, or any other party unless the jewelry is reclaimed within one (1) year or by a later time if the later time is specified by the parties in writing; and

(B)

The party delivering the jewelry, the owner of the jewelry, or any other interested party must supply to the jeweler or merchant a current mailing address in order to receive notice of a sale or other disposition of the property after one (1) year or by a later time if the later time is specified by the parties in writing; and

(2)

The jeweler or merchant receives a current mailing address from the party delivering the jewelry and, if different, the owner of the jewelry.

(c)(1)

Notice that the jewelry is deemed abandoned under this section shall be sent by certified mail to each current mailing address that has been supplied to the jeweler or merchant at least fifteen (15) days prior to the sale or other disposition of the jewelry, or a different time period if agreed to by the parties in writing.

(2)

The failure of the party delivering the jewelry, the owner of the jewelry, or any other interested party to supply a current mailing address in order to receive notice of the sale or other disposition of the jewelry is a waiver of any right, claim, or interest in the jewelry.

(d)(1)

A jeweler or merchant that disposes of jewelry under this section shall apply the proceeds from the sale or other disposition of the jewelry to:

(A)

A reasonable handling charge of the jeweler or merchant, not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00); and

(B)

The indebtedness owed to the jeweler or merchant for repairs or services performed in connection with the jewelry.

(2)

Any proceeds that exceed the amount necessary to make the jeweler or merchant whole under subdivision (d)(1) of this section shall be treated as unclaimed property and reported and paid to the Auditor of State under the Unclaimed Property Act, §18-28-201 et seq.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 652, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Unclaimed Property Act

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted by Acts 1999, No. 850, this subchapter principally follows the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act of 1995.

Publisher's Notes.

For Comments regarding the former Revised Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act, see Commentaries Volume B.

Former subchapter 2, the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act, except for §18-28-216, was repealed by Acts 1999, No. 850, § 33. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

18-28-201. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 1; 1985, No. 780, § 2; A.S.A. 1949, § 50-620; Acts 1987, No. 696, § 1; 1991, No. 1245, § 2; 1993, No. 1153, § 1; 1999, No. 720, §§ 1, 2.

18-28-202. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-621; Acts 1993, No. 1153, § 2.

18-28-203. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-622; Acts 1993, No. 1153, § 3.

18-28-204. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-623; Acts 1993, No. 1153, § 4.

18-28-205. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-624; Acts 1987, No. 696, § 2; 1993, No. 1153, § 5.

18-28-206. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-625.

18-28-207. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-626; Acts 1993, No. 1153, § 6.

18-28-208. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-627; Acts 1991, No. 1245, § 1; 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 1; 1993, No. 1153, § 7; 1997, No. 1048, § 1.

18-28-209. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-628; Acts 1993, No. 1153, § 8.

18-28-210. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-629.

18-28-211. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 11; 1983, No. 827, § 1; 1985, No. 780, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-630.

18-28-212. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 12; 1981, No. 67, § 1; 1985, No. 780, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-631; Acts 1987, No. 696, § 3; 1991, No. 786, § 29; 1993, No. 1153, § 9; 1995, No. 816, § 1.

18-28-213. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 13; 1985, No. 780, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-632; Acts 1993, No. 1153, § 10.

18-28-214. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 14; 1985, No. 780, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-633.

18-28-215. Not adopted in Arkansas.

18-28-216. Transferred to present §18-28-230.

18-28-217. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 16; 1985, No. 780, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-635; Acts 1987, No. 696, § 4; 1995, No. 816, § 2.

18-28-218. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 17; 1985, No. 780, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-636; Acts 1987, No., 696, § 5; 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 173, § 5; 1991, No. 130, § 5.

18-28-219. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 18; 1985, No. 780, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-637.

18-28-220. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 19; 1981, No. 67, § 2; 1985, No. 780, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-638; Acts 1987, No. 696, § 6; 1993, No. 1153, § 11.

18-28-221. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 20; 1985, No. 780, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-639.

18-28-222. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 21; 1985, No. 780, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-640.

18-28-223. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 22; 1985, No. 780, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-641.

18-28-224. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 23; 1985, No. 780, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-642.

18-28-225. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 24; 1985, No. 780, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-643; Acts 1997, No. 1048, § 2.

18-28-226. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 25; 1985, No. 780, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-644.

18-28-227. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 26; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-645.

18-28-228. Not adopted in Arkansas.

18-28-229. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 27; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-646.

18-28-230. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 28; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-647.

18-28-231. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 29.

18-28-232. Acts 1979, No. 256, § 30; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-647n.

18-28-233. Acts 1993, No. 1153, § 13.

The 1999 amendment of §18-28-201 by Acts 1999, No. 720, was deemed superseded by the repeal of this subchapter by Acts 1999, No. 850.

Cross References.

Museum Property Act, §13-5-1001 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1985, No. 780, § 22: Apr. 3, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that passage of this Act is necessary to enable the Auditor of the State of Arkansas to fully discharge the financial obligations of the State of Arkansas concerning the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 104, § 5: Feb. 6, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present laws relating to abandonment of property and the disposition of abandoned property are unclear in certain areas and unless clarified immediately could result in undesirable forfeitures of property and that this act is designed to correct this undesirable situation and should be given effect immediately. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 491, § 3: Mar. 18, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that under the current provisions of the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act, there is no specific provision addressing unclaimed property distributed as a result of the demutualization of an insurance company; that this act is immediately necessary because it will facilitate the collection of that property during fiscal year 2003 by expanding the scope of insurance companies required to file unclaimed property reports on May 1, 2003. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 325, § 4: Mar. 6, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that under the current provisions of the Unclaimed Property Act, §18-28-201 et seq., the Auditor of State may not deposit unclaimed property funds with the State Treasurer for investment purposes; and that the unclaimed property funds are currently held in the Unclaimed Property Proceeds Trust Fund accruing minute interest; that the authority to invest funds in the State Treasury Money Management Trust will generate a greater financial return to be used for the benefit of the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

Acts 2019, No. 492, § 2: Mar. 15, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that under the current provisions of the Unclaimed Property Act, §18-28-201 et seq., the Auditor of State may not sell securities received from a holder within the first three (3) years of custody; that security management costs and fees are costly; and that liquidating the securities upon receipt would save the state money and enable the state to invest the proceeds for a greater financial return to the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

18-28-201. Definitions.

In this subchapter:

(1)

“Administrator” means the Auditor of State.

(2)

“Apparent owner” means a person whose name appears on the records of a holder as the person entitled to property held, issued, or owing by the holder.

(3)

“Business association” means a corporation, joint stock company, investment company, partnership, unincorporated association, joint venture, limited liability company, business trust, trust company, land bank, safe deposit company, safekeeping depository, financial organization, insurance company, mutual fund, utility, or other business entity consisting of one (1) or more persons, whether or not for profit.

(4)

“Domicile” means the state of incorporation of a corporation and the state of the principal place of business of a holder other than a corporation.

(5)

“Financial organization” means a savings and loan association, building and loan association, savings bank, industrial bank, bank, banking organization, or credit union.

(6)

“Holder” means a person obligated to hold for the account of, or deliver or pay to, the owner property that is subject to this subchapter.

(7)

“Insurance company” means an association, corporation, or fraternal or mutual benefit organization, whether or not for profit, engaged in the business of providing life endowments, annuities, or insurance, including accident, burial, casualty, credit life, contract performance, dental, disability, fidelity, fire, health, hospitalization, illness, life, malpractice, marine, mortgage, surety, wage protection, and workers' compensation insurance.

(8)

“Mineral” means gas; oil; coal; other gaseous, liquid, and solid hydrocarbons; oil shale; cement material; sand and gravel; road material; building stone; chemical raw material; gemstone; fissionable and nonfissionable ores; colloidal and other clay; steam and other geothermal resource; or any other substance defined as a mineral by the law of this state.

(9)

“Mineral proceeds” means amounts payable for the extraction, production, or sale of minerals, or, upon the abandonment of those payments, all payments that become payable thereafter. The term includes amounts payable:

(i)

for the acquisition and retention of a mineral lease, including bonuses, royalties, compensatory royalties, shut-in royalties, minimum royalties, and delay rentals;

(ii)

for the extraction, production, or sale of minerals, including net revenue interests, royalties, overriding royalties, extraction payments, and production payments; and

(iii)

under an agreement or option, including a joint operating agreement, unit agreement, pooling agreement, and farm-out agreement.

(10)

“Money order” includes an express money order and a personal money order, on which the remitter is the purchaser. The term does not include a bank money order or any other instrument sold by a financial organization if the seller has obtained the name and address of the payee.

(11)

“Owner” means a person who has a legal or equitable interest in property subject to this subchapter or the person's legal representative. The term includes a depositor in the case of a deposit, a beneficiary in the case of a trust other than a deposit in trust, and a creditor, claimant, or payee in the case of other property.

(12)

“Person” means an individual, business association, financial organization, estate, trust, government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(13)(A)

“Property” means tangible property described in §18-28-203 or a fixed and certain interest in intangible property that is held, issued, or owed in the course of a holder's business, or by a government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, and all income or increments therefrom. The term includes property that is referred to as or evidenced by:

(i)

Money, a check, draft, deposit, interest, or dividend;

(ii)

Credit balance, customer's overpayment, security deposit, refund, credit memorandum, unpaid wage, unused ticket, mineral proceeds, or unidentified remittance;

(iii)

Stock or other evidence of ownership of an interest in a business association or financial organization;

(iv)

A bond, debenture, note, or other evidence of indebtedness;

(v)

Money deposited to redeem stocks, bonds, coupons, or other securities or to make distributions;

(vi)

An amount due and payable under the terms of an annuity or insurance policy, including policies providing life insurance, property and casualty insurance, workers' compensation insurance, or health and disability insurance; and

(vii)

An amount distributable from a trust or custodial fund established under a plan to provide health, welfare, pension, vacation, severance, retirement, death, stock purchase, profit sharing, employee savings, supplemental unemployment insurance, or similar benefits.

(B)

“Property” does not include:

(i)

gift certificates, gift cards, in-store merchandise credits, or layaway accounts issued or maintained by a person in the business of selling tangible personal property at retail;

(ii)

a patronage dividend, capital credit, customer deposit, or nonnegotiated payment check that does not exceed one hundred dollars ($100) held or owing by an agricultural farm supply cooperative association organized under the laws of this state; or

(iii)

funds distributable from a trust or custodial account established by a State of Arkansas-supported retirement system administered by an agency of the State of Arkansas under a plan to provide a defined benefit pension plan that is qualified for tax deferral under the income tax laws of the state.

(14)

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(15)

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

(16)

“Utility” means persons and corporations, or their lessees, trustees, and receivers, owning or operating in this state equipment or facilities as provided in §23-1-101.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 1; 2009, No. 1174, § 1; 2013, No. 86, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted (13)(B)(ii), redesignated the existing text of (13)(B) accordingly, deleted “and such items shall not be subject to this subchapter” at the end of (13)(B)(i), and made related changes.

The 2013 amendment added (13)(B)(iii).

18-28-202. Presumptions of abandonment.

(a)

Property is presumed abandoned if it is unclaimed by the apparent owner during the time stated below for the particular property:

(1)

Traveler's check, fifteen (15) years after issuance;

(2)

Money order, seven (7) years after issuance;

(3)

Stock or other equity interest in a business association or financial organization, including a security entitlement under the Uniform Commercial Code — Investment Securities, §4-8-101 et seq., seven (7) years after the earlier of:

(A)

The date of the most recent dividend, stock split, or other distribution unclaimed by the apparent owner;

(B)

The date of the second mailing of a statement of account or other notification or communication that was returned as undeliverable or after the holder discontinued mailings, notifications, or communications to the apparent owner; or

(C)

The date that the security holder or payee is presumed lost or unresponsive under 17 C.F.R. § 240.17Ad-17, as it existed on January 23, 2013;

(4)

Debt of a business association or financial organization, other than a bearer bond or an original issue discount bond, three (3) years after the date of the most recent interest payment unclaimed by the apparent owner;

(5)

A demand, savings, or time deposit, including a deposit that is automatically renewable, three (3) years after the earlier of maturity or the date of the last indication by the owner of interest in the property; but a deposit that is automatically renewable is not matured for purposes of this section upon its initial date of maturity, unless the most recent correspondence from the financial organization to the owner has been returned unclaimed or undelivered to the financial organization by the postal service;

(6)

Money or credits owed to a customer as a result of a retail business transaction, three (3) years after the obligation accrued;

(7)

Amount owed by an insurer on a life or endowment insurance policy or an annuity that has matured or terminated, three (3) years after the obligation to pay arose or, in the case of a policy or annuity payable upon proof of death, three (3) years after the insured has attained, or would have attained if living, the limiting age under the mortality table on which the reserve is based;

(8)

Property distributable by a business association or financial organization in a course of dissolution, one (1) year after the property becomes distributable;

(9)

Property received by a court as proceeds of a class action, and not distributed pursuant to the judgment, one (1) year after the distribution date;

(10)

Property held by a court, government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, one (1) year after the property becomes distributable;

(11)

Wages or other compensation for personal services, one (1) year after the compensation becomes payable;

(12)

Deposit or refund owed to a subscriber by a utility, one (1) year after the deposit or refund becomes payable;

(13)

Property in an individual retirement account, defined benefit plan, or other account or plan that is qualified for tax deferral under the income tax laws of the United States, three (3) years after the earliest of the date of the distribution or attempted distribution of the property, the date of the required distribution as stated in the plan or trust agreement governing the plan, or the date, if determinable by the holder, specified in the income tax laws of the United States by which distribution of the property must begin in order to avoid a tax penalty;

(14)

All other property, three (3) years after the owner's right to demand the property or after the obligation to pay or distribute the property arises, whichever first occurs; and

(15)

Unclaimed property payable or distributable in the course of a demutualization of an insurance company three (3) years after the earlier of:

(A)

The date of last contact with the policy holder; or

(B)

The date the property became payable or distributable.

(b)

At the time that an interest is presumed abandoned under subsection (a), any other property right accrued or accruing to the owner as a result of the interest, and not previously presumed abandoned, is also presumed abandoned.

(c)

Property is unclaimed if, for the applicable period set forth in subsection (a), the apparent owner has not communicated in writing or by other means reflected in a contemporaneous record prepared by or on behalf of the holder, with the holder concerning the property or the account in which the property is held, and has not otherwise indicated an interest in the property. A communication with an owner by a person other than the holder or its representative who has not in writing identified the property to the owner is not an indication of interest in the property by the owner.

(d)

An indication of an owner's interest in property includes:

(1)

the presentment of a check or other instrument of payment of a dividend or other distribution made with respect to an account or underlying stock or other interest in a business association or financial organization or, in the case of a distribution made by electronic or similar means, evidence that the distribution has been received;

(2)

owner-directed activity in the account in which the property is held, including a direction by the owner to increase, decrease, or change the amount or type of property held in the account;

(3)

the making of a deposit to or withdrawal from a bank account;

(4)

correspondence from the financial organization to the owner of the property by mail, which correspondence has not been returned unclaimed or undelivered to the financial organization by the postal service; and

(5)

the payment of a premium with respect to a property interest in an insurance policy; but the application of an automatic premium loan provision or other nonforfeiture provision contained in an insurance policy does not prevent a policy from maturing or terminating if the insured has died or the insured or the beneficiary of the policy has otherwise become entitled to the proceeds before the depletion of the cash surrender value of a policy by the application of those provisions.

(e)

Property is payable or distributable for purposes of this subchapter notwithstanding the owner's failure to make demand or present an instrument or document otherwise required to obtain payment.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 2; 2001, No. 793, §§ 1, 2; 2003, No. 491, § 1; 2015, No. 1039, § 1; 2017, No. 421, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment, in (a)(5), substituted “shall not be deemed” for “is deemed,” inserted “most recent correspondence from the financial organization to the,” and substituted “been returned … postal service” for “consented to a renewal at or about the time of the renewal and the consent is in writing or is evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with the holder”; and inserted (d)(iv), redesignated the remaining subdivision accordingly, and made related changes.

The 2003 amendment added (a)(15).

The 2015 amendment substituted “three (3) years” for “five (5) years” in (a)(4), (a)(5), (a)(14), and (a)(15); substituted “stated” for “set forth” in the introductory language of (a); redesignated (a)(3)(i) and (ii) as (a)(3)(A) and (B); and substituted “is not” for “shall not be deemed” in (a)(5).

The 2017 amendment substituted “the Uniform Commercial Code — Investment Securities, §4-8-101 et seq., seven (7) years” for “§4-8-101 et seq. (UCC — Investment Securities), five (5) years” in the introductory language of (a)(3); added (a)(3)(C); and made stylistic changes.

18-28-203. Contents of safe deposit box or other safekeeping depository.

Tangible property held in a safe deposit box or other safekeeping depository in this state in the ordinary course of the holder's business and proceeds resulting from the sale of the property permitted by other law, are presumed abandoned if the property remains unclaimed by the owner for more than five (5) years after expiration of the lease or rental period on the box or other depository.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 3.

18-28-204. Rules for taking custody.

Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter or by other statute of this state, property that is presumed abandoned, whether located in this or another state, is subject to the custody of this state if:

(1)

the last known address of the apparent owner, as shown on the records of the holder, is in this state;

(2)

the records of the holder do not reflect the identity of the person entitled to the property and it is established that the last known address of the person entitled to the property is in this state;

(3)

the records of the holder do not reflect the last known address of the apparent owner and it is established that:

(i)

the last known address of the person entitled to the property is in this state; or

(ii)

the holder is domiciled in this state or is a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality of this state and has not previously paid or delivered the property to the state of the last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property;

(4)

the last known address of the apparent owner, as shown on the records of the holder, is in a state that does not provide for the escheat or custodial taking of the property and the holder is domiciled in this state or is a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality of this state;

(5)

the last known address of the apparent owner, as shown on the records of the holder, is in a foreign country and the holder is domiciled in this state or is a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality of this state;

(6)

the transaction out of which the property arose occurred in this state, the holder is domiciled in a state that does not provide for the escheat or custodial taking of the property, and the last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property is unknown or is in a state that does not provide for the escheat or custodial taking of the property; or

(7)

the property is a traveler's check or money order purchased in this state, or the issuer of the traveler's check or money order has its principal place of business in this state and the issuer's records show that the instrument was purchased in a state that does not provide for the escheat or custodial taking of the property, or do not show the state in which the instrument was purchased.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 4.

18-28-205. Dormancy charge.

A holder may deduct from property presumed abandoned a charge imposed by reason of the owner's failure to claim the property within a specified time only if there is a valid and enforceable written contract between the holder and the owner under which the holder may impose the charge and the holder regularly imposes the charge, which is not regularly reversed or otherwise canceled. The amount of the deduction is limited to an amount that is not unconscionable.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 5.

18-28-206. Burden of proof as to property evidenced by record of check or draft.

A record of the issuance of a check, draft, or similar instrument is prima facie evidence of an obligation. In claiming property from a holder who is also the issuer, the administrator's burden of proof as to the existence and amount of the property and its abandonment is satisfied by showing issuance of the instrument and passage of the requisite period of abandonment. Defenses of payment, satisfaction, discharge, and want of consideration are affirmative defenses that must be established by the holder.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 6.

18-28-207. Report of abandoned property.

(a)

A holder of property presumed abandoned shall make a report to the administrator concerning the property.

(b)

The report must be verified and must contain:

(1)

a description of the property;

(2)

except with respect to a traveler's check or money order, the name, if known, and last known address, if any, and the social security number or taxpayer identification number, if readily ascertainable, of the apparent owner of property of the value of fifty dollars ($50.00) or more;

(3)

an aggregated amount of items valued under fifty dollars ($50.00) each;

(4)

in the case of an amount of fifty dollars ($50.00) or more held or owing under an annuity or a life or endowment insurance policy, the full name and last known address of the annuitant or insured and of the beneficiary;

(5)

in the case of property held in a safe deposit box or other safekeeping depository, an indication of the place where it is held and where it may be inspected by the administrator, and any amounts owing to the holder;

(6)

the date, if any, on which the property became payable, demandable, or returnable, and the date of the last transaction with the apparent owner with respect to the property; and

(7)

other information that the administrator by rule prescribes as necessary for the administration of this subchapter.

(c)

If a holder of property presumed abandoned is a successor to another person who previously held the property for the apparent owner or the holder has changed its name while holding the property, the holder shall file with the report its former names, if any, and the known names and addresses of all previous holders of the property.

(d)

The report must be filed before November 1 of each year and cover the twelve (12) months next preceding July 1 of that year, but a report with respect to a life insurance company, including the report and remittance of unclaimed insurance company demutualization proceeds made under §18-28-202(a)(15), must be filed before May 1 of each year for the calendar year next preceding.

(e)(1)

The holder of property presumed abandoned shall send written notice to the apparent owner, not more than one hundred eighty (180) days or less than ninety (90) days before filing the report, stating that the holder is in possession of property subject to this subchapter, if:

(A)

the holder has in its records an address for the apparent owner which the holder's records do not disclose to be inaccurate;

(B)

the claim of the apparent owner is not barred by a statute of limitations; and

(C)

the value of the property is fifty dollars ($50.00) or more.

(2)

If the property presumed abandoned is a security or security entitlement under the Uniform Commercial Code — Investment Securities, §4-8-101 et seq., or tangible property held in a safe deposit box or other safekeeping depository in this state, the holder shall send the notice required under subdivision (e)(1) of this section by letter.

(f)

Before the date for filing the report, the holder of property presumed abandoned may request the administrator to extend the time for filing the report. The administrator may grant the extension for good cause. The holder, upon receipt of the extension, may make an interim payment on the amount the holder estimates will ultimately be due, which terminates the accrual of additional interest on the amount paid.

(g)

The holder of property presumed abandoned shall file with the report an affidavit stating that the holder has complied with subsection (e).

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 7; 2003, No. 491, § 2; 2017, No. 622, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment inserted “including the report and remittance … §18-28-202(a)(15)” in (d).

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (e) as (e)(1); in (e)(1), substituted “one hundred eighty (180) days” for “one hundred twenty (120) days” and “ninety (90) days” for “sixty (60) days”; redesignated former (e)(1) through (e)(3) as (e)(1)(A) through (e)(1)(C); and added (e)(2).

18-28-208. Payment or delivery of abandoned property.

(a)

Except for property held in a safe deposit box or other safekeeping depository, upon filing the report required by §18-28-207, the holder of property presumed abandoned shall pay, deliver, or cause to be paid or delivered to the administrator the property described in the report as unclaimed, but if the property is an automatically renewable deposit, and a penalty or forfeiture in the payment of interest would result, the time for compliance is extended until a penalty or forfeiture would no longer result. Tangible property held in a safe deposit box or other safekeeping depository may not be delivered to the administrator until one hundred twenty (120) days after filing the report required by §18-28-207.

(b)

If the property reported to the administrator is a security or security entitlement under §4-8-101 et seq. (UCC — Investment Securities), the administrator is an appropriate person to make an indorsement, instruction, or entitlement order on behalf of the apparent owner to invoke the duty of the issuer or its transfer agent or the securities intermediary to transfer or dispose of the security or the security entitlement in accordance with §4-8-101 et seq. (UCC — Investment Securities).

(c)

If the holder of property reported to the administrator is the issuer of a certificated security, the administrator has the right to obtain a replacement certificate pursuant to §4-8-405, but an indemnity bond is not required.

(d)

An issuer, the holder, and any transfer agent or other person acting pursuant to the instructions of and on behalf of the issuer or holder in accordance with this section is not liable to the apparent owner and must be indemnified against claims of any person in accordance with §18-28-210.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 8.

18-28-209. Notice and publication of lists of abandoned property.

The administrator shall publish a notice not later than November 30 of the year next following the year in which abandoned property has been paid or delivered to the administrator. The notice must be published in a newspaper of general circulation in each county of this state. The advertisement must be in a form that, in the judgment of the administrator, is likely to attract the attention of the potential owners of the unclaimed property. The advertisement shall contain:

(1)

A statement explaining that the property the administrator is holding is presumed to be abandoned and has been taken into the protective custody of the administrator;

(2)(A)

A statement explaining that additional information concerning the property may be obtained by consulting one (1) or more of the following:

(i)

The Internet address of the administrator's official website;

(ii)

The telephone number for the administrator's office; and

(iii)

Posting of a notice at the county courthouse.

(B)

A statement under this subdivision (a)(2) shall include the:

(i)

Internet address of the administrator's official website; and

(ii)

Telephone number for the administrator's office; and

(3)

A statement that information about the property and its return to the owner is available to a person having a legal or beneficial interest in the property, upon request to the administrator.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 9; 2015, No. 592, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment, in the introductory language, substituted “each county of this state” for “the county of this state in which is located the last known address of any person named in the notice.
If a holder does not report an address for the apparent owner, or the address is outside the state, the notice must be published in the county in which the holder has its principal place of business within this state or another county that the administrator reasonably selects”, substituted “potential owners” for “apparent owner”, and substituted “advertisement shall” for “form must” near the end; deleted (a)(1) and (2), redesignated former (a)(3) as (a)(1) and redesignated former (a)(4) as (a)(3); substituted “the property the administrator is holding” for “property of the owner” in present (a)(1); inserted (a)(2); and deleted (b).